test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kandua_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kandua: # Verb 'to carry / kantaa' - full paradigm
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kannan
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kannat
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kandau
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kannammo
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kannatto
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kannetah
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kanna
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: kanneta
 
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kannoin
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kannoit
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kandoi
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kannoimmo
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kannoitto
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kannettih
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kandanuh
      kandua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: kannettu
      
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1:  kandazin
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2:  kandazit
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3:  kandas
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1:  kandazimmo
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2:  kandazitto
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3:  kannettas
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kandas
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  kannettas

      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1:  kandanuzin
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2:  kandanuzit
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3:  kandanus
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1:  kandanuzimmo
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2:  kandanuzitto
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3:  kannetannus
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: kandanus
      kandua+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:  kannetannus

      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Sg1:  kandanen
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Sg2:  kandanet
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Sg3:  kandanou
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Pl1:  kandanemmo
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Pl2:  kandanetto
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+Pl3:  kannetanneh
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: kandane
      kandua+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg+Pl3:  kannetanne

      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:  kanna
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:  kandakkah
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:  kandakkuammo
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [kandakkua, kandakkuatto]
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:  kannettahes
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kanna
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: kandakkah
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl1: kandakkuammo
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: kandakkua
      kandua+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: kannettahes

      kandua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kandai
      kandua+V+Act+PrfPrc: kandanuh
      kandua+V+Pss+PrsPrc: kannettavu
      kandua+V+Pss+PrfPrc: kannettu
      kandua+V+Inf: kandua
 
 
